Washington statutes.
RCW 16.24.210

Bull breed and ratio restrictions not applicable to counties west of Cascades.

RCW 16.24.190 and 16.24.200 shall not apply to counties lying west of the summit of the Cascade mountains.

[ 1989 c 286 s 17; 1985 c 415 s 19. Formerly RCW 16.20.035.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 286: See note following RCW 16.04.010.